Arkansas, session 2025, HB1334.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. The purpose of this act is to amend Title 24, Chapter 4,
Subchapter 2 of the Arkansas Code to address delinquency and collection of
employer and employee contributions to the Arkansas Public Employees'
Retirement System from a participating local government employer.






*LJH116*
01/30/2025 3:16:30 PM LJH116